Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB258.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section,
(a) "Bus stop camera system" means a system of one (1) or more fixed video
cameras placed at a school bus stop which is capable of recording and
storing video images;
(b) "Qualifying school district" means a county school district in a county with
a consolidated local government adopted under KRS Chapter 67C; and
(c) "School bus stop" means a common location near the side of a highway or
street where children board and disembark a school bus for a school that is
part of a qualifying school district, but shall not include the area in front of
a residence where children from that residence board and disembark a
school bus.
(2) A unit of government responsible for the maintenance of a highway, road, or
street on which a school bus stop in a qualifying school district is located shall
install a bus stop camera system at each school bus stop within its jurisdiction.
(3) On or before July 1, 2025, and on or before July 1 each year thereafter, a
qualifying school district shall inform the Transportation Cabinet district office,
and any other units of local governments which maintain roads and streets in its
jurisdiction, of the location of each school bus stop in the district.
(4) Video images from a bus stop camera system shall be retained by the entity that
installed the cameras and may be obtained only:
(a) By a qualifying school district investigating a student discipline matter;
(b) By a law enforcement agency; or
(c) In response to a subpoena duces tecum.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2025 11:17 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1072
(5) The unit of government that installed the bus stop camera system shall retain the
video images recorded by the system for a period of thirty (30) days and shall
delete the data after that period, except when the data:
(a) Is being used as evidence in a felony prosecution;
(b) Is being used by a qualifying school district in a student disciplinary matter;
or
(c) Has become subject to a subpoena duces tecum.
(6) Video images recorded by a bus stop camera system that were retained in
accordance with Section (5) of this Act shall be deleted within seven (7) days of
the conclusion of any proceeding for which the images were retained.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2025 11:17 AM Jacketed